Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-710.15
Sickness and accident insurance; acts of insurer; no waiver.

The acknowledgment by an insurer of the receipt of notice given under any policy of sickness and accident insurance, the furnishing of forms for filing proofs of loss, the acceptance of such proofs, or the investigation of any claim thereunder shall not operate as a waiver of any of the rights of the insurer in defense of any claim arising under such policy.

Laws 1957, c. 188, § 16, p. 658;

Laws 1969, c. 375, § 1, p. 1335;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 145.